Hawaii, session 2026, GM1152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 704-421, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (3) to read as follows:
"(3) During the defendant's commitment to the custody of
the director of health or release on conditions pursuant to
subsection (1):
(a) If the defendant's clinical team determines that the
defendant meets the criteria for involuntary
hospitalization set forth in section 334-60.2, the
director of health, within seven days of the clinical
team's determination, shall file with the family court
a petition for involuntary hospitalization pursuant to
section 334-60.3. If the petition is granted, the
defendant shall remain hospitalized for a period of
time as provided by section 334-60.6; or
(b) If the defendant's clinical team determines that the
defendant does not meet the criteria for involuntary
hospitalization, or the court denies the petition for
2026-3465 HB2505 CDl HMSO

Page 2 H.B. NO. ""
I. s □ -I
C.D. 1
involuntary hospitalization, the defendant's clinical
team shall determine whether an assisted community
treatment plan is appropriate pursuant to part VIII of
chapter 334. If the clinical team determines that an
assisted community treatment plan is appropriate, the
clinical team shall identify a community mental health
outpatient program that agrees to provide the mental
health services to’ the defendant in the event the
assisted community treatment petition is granted. The
psychiatrist or advanced practice registered nurse
from the clinical team or the community mental health
outpatient program shall prepare the certificate for
assisted community treatment specified by section
334-123, including a written treatment plan for the
provision of mental health services to the defendant.
[The clinical team ahall identify a eemmunity mental
health outpatient program that agrcGD—to provide
mental -health s-ervicoo—to the defendant -a-s the
deoignated mental heal-th progr-om under the aooioted
community treatment order.] The clinical team or the
community mental health outpatient program shall
2026-3465 HB2505 CDl HMSO
iMiiiiiiiiiiiiHniini

Page 3 H.B. NO. 2505
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
provide the defendant with a copy of the certificate.
Within ten days of provision of the certificate to the
defendant by the clinical team [7-] or the community
mental health outpatient program^ the director of
health or the community mental health outpatient
program shall file with the family court the assisted
community treatment petition described in section
334-123. When a petition for assisted community
treatment has been filed for a defendant, the
defendant committed to the custody of the director of
health shall remain in custody until the family court
issues a decision on the petition; provided that the
judge may order that the subject be released during
the pendency of that action."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-3465 HB2505 CDl HMSO

inniiiiiiiiiHiin

2505
H.B. NO.
:□b
w
o
o b
APPROVED this 27th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2505, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2505, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
President of the S^ats
C^ri^o^w^^^e
110-26